Georgia statutes. TITLE 11 Commercial Code
PART 7 2001 Transition

11-9-701.
Effective date.

This article takes effect on July 1, 2001.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-701, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-702.
Savings clause.

Pre-effective date transactions or liens.Except as otherwise provided in this part, this article applies to a transaction or lien within its scope, even if the transaction or lien was entered into or created before July 1, 2001.

Continuing validity.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (c) of this Code section and Code Sections 11-9-703 through 11-9-709:

Transactions and liens that were not governed by former Article 9 of this title, were validly entered into or created before July 1, 2001, and would be subject to this article if they had been entered into or created on or after July 1, 2001, and the rights, duties, and interests flowing from those transactions and liens remain valid on or after July 1, 2001; and

The transactions and liens may be terminated, completed, consummated, and enforced as required or permitted by this article or by the law, as amended and in effect from time to time, that otherwise would apply before July 1, 2001.

Pre-effective date proceedings.This article and amendments to other Code sections which amendments were enacted in conjunction with this article do not affect an action, case, or proceeding commenced before July 1, 2001.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-702, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-703.
Security interest perfected before effective date.

Continuing priority over lien creditor; perfection requirements satisfied.A security interest that is enforceable immediately before July 1, 2001, and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time is a perfected security interest under this article if, on July 1, 2001, the applicable requirements for enforceability and perfection under this article are satisfied without further action.

Continuing priority over lien creditor; perfection requirements not satisfied.Except as otherwise provided in Code Section 11-9-705, if, immediately before July 1, 2001, a security interest is enforceable and would have priority over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time, but the applicable requirements for enforceability or perfection under this article are not satisfied on July 1, 2001, the security interest:

Is a perfected security interest on and for one year after July 1, 2001;

Remains enforceable thereafter only if the security interest becomes enforceable under Code Section 11-9-203 before the year expires; and

Remains perfected thereafter only if the applicable requirements for perfection under this article are satisfied before the year expires.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-703, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-704.
Security interest unperfected before effective date.

A security interest that is enforceable immediately before July 1, 2001, but which would be subordinate to the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor at that time:

Remains an enforceable security interest on and for one year after July 1, 2001;

Remains enforceable thereafter if the security interest becomes enforceable under Code Section 11-9-203 on July 1, 2001, or within one year thereafter; and

Becomes perfected:

Without further action, on July 1, 2001, if the applicable requirements for perfection under this article are satisfied before or at that time; or

When the applicable requirements for perfection are satisfied if the requirements are satisfied after that time.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-704, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-705.
Effectiveness of action taken before effective date.

Pre-effective date action; one-year perfection period unless reperfected.If action, other than the filing of a financing statement, is taken before July 1, 2001, and the action would have resulted in priority of a security interest over the rights of a person that becomes a lien creditor had the security interest become enforceable before July 1, 2001, the action is effective to perfect a security interest that attaches under this article within one year after July 1, 2001. An attached security interest becomes unperfected one year after July 1, 2001, unless the security interest becomes a perfected security interest under this article before the expiration of that period.

Pre-effective date filing.The filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, is effective to perfect a security interest to the extent the filing would satisfy the applicable requirements for perfection under this article.

Pre-effective date filing in jurisdiction formerly governing perfection.This article and amendments to other Code sections which amendments were enacted in conjunction with this article do not render ineffective an effective financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former Code Section 11-9-103. However, except as otherwise provided in subsections (d) and (e) of this Code section and Code Section 11-9-706, the financing statement ceases to be effective at the earlier of:

The time the financing statement would have ceased to be effective under the law of the jurisdiction in which it is filed; or

June 30, 2006.

Continuation statement.The filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2001, does not continue the effectiveness of the financing statement filed before July 1, 2001. However, upon the timely filing of a continuation statement on or after July 1, 2001, and in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 of this article, the effectiveness of a financing statement filed in the same office in that jurisdiction before July 1, 2001, continues for the period provided by the law of that jurisdiction.

Application of paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section to transmitting utility financing statement.Paragraph (2) of subsection (c) of this Code section applies to a financing statement that, before July 1, 2001, is filed against a transmitting utility and satisfies the applicable requirements for perfection under the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in former Code Section 11-9-103 only to the extent that Part 3 of this article provides that the law of a jurisdiction other than jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed governs perfection of a security interest in collateral covered by the financing statement.

Application of Part 5 of this article.A financing statement that includes a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001, and a continuation statement filed on or after July 1, 2001, is effective only to the extent that it satisfies the requirements of Part 5 of this article for an initial financing statement.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-705, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-706.
When initial financing statement suffices to continue effectiveness of financing statement.

Initial financing statement in lieu of continuation statement.The filing of an initial financing statement in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501 continues the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001, if:

The filing of an initial financing statement in that office would be effective to perfect a security interest under this article;

The pre-effective date financing statement was filed in an office in another state or another office in this state; and

The initial financing statement satisfies subsection (c) of this Code section.

Period of continued effectiveness.The filing of an initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this Code section continues the effectiveness of the pre-effective date financing statement:

If the initial financing statement is filed before July 1, 2001, for the period provided in former Code Section 11-9-403 with respect to a financing statement; and

If the initial financing statement is filed on or after July 1, 2001, for the period provided in Code Section 11-9-515 with respect to an initial financing statement.

Requirements for initial financing statement under subsection (a) of this Code section.To be effective for purposes of subsection (a), an initial financing statement must:

Satisfy the requirements of Part 5 of this article for an initial financing statement;

Identify the pre-effective date financing statement by indicating the office in which the financing statement was filed and providing the dates of filing and file numbers, if any, of the financing statement and of the most recent continuation statement filed with respect to the financing statement; and

Indicate that the pre-effective date financing statement remains effective.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-706, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-707.
Amendment of pre-effective date financing statement.

“Pre-effective date financing statement.” In this Code section, “pre-effective date financing statement” means a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001.

Applicable law.On or after July 1, 2001, a person may add or delete collateral covered by, continue or terminate the effectiveness of, or otherwise amend the information provided in a pre-effective date financing statement only in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 of this article. However, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement also may be terminated in accordance with the law of the jurisdiction in which the financing statement is filed.

Method of amending: general rule.Except as otherwise provided in subsection (d) of this Code section, if the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the information in a pre-effective date financing statement may be amended on or after July 1, 2001, only if:

The pre-effective date financing statement and an amendment are filed in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501;

An amendment is filed in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501 concurrently with, or after the filing in that office of, an initial financing statement that satisfies subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-706; or

An initial financing statement that provides the information as amended and satisfies subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-706 is filed in the office specified in Code Section 11-9-501.

Method of amending: continuation.If the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement may be continued only under subsections (d) and (f) of Code Section 11-9-705 or Code Section 11-9-706.

Method of amending: additional termination rule.Whether or not the law of this state governs perfection of a security interest, the effectiveness of a pre-effective date financing statement filed in this state may be terminated on and after July 1, 2001, by filing a termination statement in the office in which the pre-effective date financing statement is filed, unless an initial financing statement that satisfies subsection (c) of Code Section 11-9-706 has been filed in the office specified by the law of the jurisdiction governing perfection as provided in Part 3 of this article as the office in which to file a financing statement.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-707, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-708.
Persons entitled to file initial financing statement or continuation statement.

A person may file an initial financing statement or a continuation statement under this part if:

The secured party of record authorizes the filing; and

The filing is necessary under this part:

To continue the effectiveness of a financing statement filed before July 1, 2001; or

To perfect or continue the perfection of a security interest.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-708, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-709.
Priority.

Law governing priority.This article determines the priority of conflicting claims to collateral. However, if the relative priorities of the claims were established before July 1, 2001, former Article 9 of this title determines priority.

Priority if security interest becomes enforceable under Code Section 11-9-203.For purposes of subsection (a) of Code Section 11-9-322, the priority of a security interest that becomes enforceable under Code Section 11-9-203 dates from July 1, 2001, if the security interest is perfected under this article by the filing of a financing statement before July 1, 2001, which would not have been effective to perfect the security interest under former Article 9 of this title. This subsection does not apply to conflicting security interests each of which is perfected by the filing of such a financing statement.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-709, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.

11-9-710.
Exculpation.

From July 1, 2001, until July 1, 2006, any search company shall not be liable to its customer as a result of failing to disclose the existence of a filed financing statement in any filing office or index maintained by the authority searched in good faith by such search company to the extent such failure is attributable either to the failure of such filing office or the authority, as the case may be, to have properly indexed such filed financing statement or to the failure of the search logic used by such filing office or the authority, as the case may be, to disclose such filed financing statement in response to a search in the appropriate records of such filing office or of such index in the name provided to such search company by its customer. As used in this Code section, “search company” shall mean any person engaged in the business of conducting or arranging searches of public records of filed financing statements. On and after July 1, 2006, the liability of a search company shall be determined by law other than this article.

History. —
Code 1981, §11-9-710, enacted by Ga. L. 2001, p. 362, § 1.